Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 31 Boxing Match Licenses

31-31-1 through 31-31-6.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1052, § 1, effective July 1, 1998.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was based on Code 1981, §

31-31-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 941, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 480, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-31-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 941, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 671, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-31-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 941, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, § 4; Code 1981, § 31-31-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 941, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, § 5; Code 1981, § 31-31-4.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, § 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 674, § 1; Code 1981, § 31-31-4.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, § 6; Code 1981, § 31-31-4.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, § 6; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31; Code 1981, § 31-31-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 941, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, § 7; Code 1981, § 31-31-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 941, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1223, § 8; Code 1981, § 31-31-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 674, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 840, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 671, § 2.

This chapter was repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1052, § 1, effective July 1, 1998. Ga. L. 1998, p. 1052, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective only upon the express appropriation of funds by the General Assembly to carry out the purposes of this Act.” Funding was appropriated effective July 1, 1998. For present provisions relating to the Georgia Athletic and Entertainment Commission, see Chapter 4B of Title 43.